Maryland, session 2025, HB0543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–455.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DIRECTORY INFORMATION” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL’S NAME,
ADDRESS, TELEPHONE NUMBER, DATE AND PLACE OF BIRTH, AND DATES OF
ATTENDANCE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0543*

HOUSE BILL 543
(3) “PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION” MEANS ANY
INFORMATION THAT CAN BE USED TO IDENTIFY A PARTICULAR INDIVIDUAL,
INCLUDING THE INDIVIDUAL’S NAME, SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER, DATE AND PLACE
OF BIRTH, PARENT’S OR GUARDIAN’S INFORMATION, AND HEALTH RECORDS.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION, EACH COUNTY
BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A POLICY FOR THE PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM TO AUTHORIZE THE DISCLOSURE OF A STUDENT’S DIRECTORY
INFORMATION OR PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF
SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT FOR A STUDENT.
(C) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A STUDENT’S DIRECTORY INFORMATION MAY BE DISCLOSED BY A
PUBLIC SCHOOL TO A DETOXIFICATION CENTER OR A HOSPITAL FOR THE PURPOSE
OF SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT IF THE STUDENT CONSENTS TO SUBSTANCE
ABUSE TREATMENT UNDER § 20–102 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
(II) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY NOT DISCLOSE A STUDENT’S
DIRECTORY INFORMATION UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IF A
PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF THE STUDENT OPTS OUT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
PROCESS ESTABLISHED BY THE COUNTY BOARD UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS
SECTION.
(2) A STUDENT’S PERSONALLY IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION SHALL
BE DISCLOSED BY A PUBLIC SCHOOL TO A DETOXIFICATION CENTER OR A HOSPITAL
FOR THE PURPOSE OF SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT IF:
(I) THE STUDENT IS EXPERIENCING A HEALTH EMERGENCY
EVENT UNDER § 8–501 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(II) THE DISCLOSURE OF THE STUDENT’S PERSONALLY
IDENTIFIABLE INFORMATION IS NECESSARY TO PROTECT THE HEALTH AND SAFETY
OF THE STUDENT.
(D) THE POLICY ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE TO PARENTS OR GUARDIANS OF STUDENTS IN THE LOCAL
SCHOOL SYSTEM THAT:
(1) A PUBLIC SCHOOL MAY DISCLOSE A STUDENT’S DIRECTORY
INFORMATION TO A DETOXIFICATION CENTER OR HOSPITAL FOR THE PURPOSE OF
SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT OF A STUDENT UNDER SPECIFIED CIRCUMSTANCES;
AND

HOUSE BILL 543 3
(2) A PARENT OR GUARDIAN OF A STUDENT MAY OPT OUT OF THE
DISCLOSURE OF A STUDENT’S DIRECTORY INFORMATION UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND THE PROCESS FOR OPTING OUT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.